Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 1 General Provisions as to Civil Actions
§ 1-1-123.
Assumption
of risk.

Any person who takes part in any sport or recreational opportunity assumes the inherent risks in that sport or recreational opportunity, whether those risks are known or unknown, and is legally responsible for any and all damage, injury or death to himself or other persons or property that results from the inherent risks in that sport or recreational opportunity.

A provider of any sport or recreational opportunity is not required to eliminate, alter or control the inherent risks within the particular sport or recreational opportunity.

Actions based upon negligence of the provider wherein the damage, injury or death is not the result of an inherent risk of the sport or recreational opportunity shall be preserved pursuant to W.S.

1-1-109

.

The assumption of risk provisions in subsections (a) through (c) of this section apply irrespective of the age of the person assuming the risk.

This act shall not apply to skiing in a ski area as defined by the Ski Safety Act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 228, § 1; 1996, ch. 78, § 1; 2011, ch. 91, § 1; 2017 ch. 192, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2011 amendment,

added (d).

Laws 2011, ch. 91, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added (e).

Scope. —

This act bars recovery for “inherent risks” only, not for all risks. Walters v. Grand Teton Crest Outfitters, Inc., 804 F. Supp. 1442, 1992 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15892 (D. Wyo. 1992).

Summary judgment. —

If a motion for summary judgment is filed, a trial court must scrutinize the facts brought forward by the parties with great care, and if the court can say that, given that evidence, this is an “inherent risk” of a recreational activity under this section and the guidance of Colo. Rev. Stat. Ann. §

33-44-103

(3.5), N.M. Stat. Ann. § 24-15-10, and Utah Code Ann. § 78-27-52 with regards to skiing and reasonable minds cannot differ about that, then summary judgment is appropriate. If the risk is an inherent one, then the provider has no duty to eliminate, alter, or control it; however, if reasonable minds could differ as to whether or not the risk was one inherent to the recreational activity, then summary judgment is not appropriate and the answer to the question must be assigned to the jury (or other fact finder). Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp. v. Rohrman, 2006 WY 156, 150 P.3d 167,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2006).

In reviewing summary judgment granted for a ski resort on the basis of the Wyoming Recreation Safety Act, the court defined the risk at the level of specificity supported by the record, and asked: Whether encountering boulders, and gaps between them, in changing snow conditions in an off-piste area of a ski resort was an “inherent risk” of alpine skiing? Roberts v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp., 884 F.3d 967, 2018 U.S. App. LEXIS 5552 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2018).

Action against a ski resort was properly decided on the basis of summary judgment because boulders and the gaps of widely varying dimensions between them—at times exposed to the elements and at others lightly covered by fresh snow—were an inherent risk of skiing an off-piste run. The provider did nothing to exacerbate the inherent risk posed by the hazard. Roberts v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp., 884 F.3d 967, 2018 U.S. App. LEXIS 5552 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2018).

District court
properly granted summary judgment in favor of a horseback riding
services
provider with respect to a rider's claim that her fall and
resulting
injuries were the result of her saddle cinch being too
loose because,
when the cinching of a saddle can be too tight or
too loose, and the
cinching is not done with scientific precision,
it is inherent in
the sport that the provider at times will cinch
too loosely or too
tightly. Kovnat v. Xanterra Parks & Resorts, 770 F.3d 949, 2014 U.S. App. LEXIS 20140 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2014).

Equine activity injuries. —

Although the Wyoming Recreation Safety Act's definition of an equine activity extends to injuries received while evaluating the horse in contemplation of a sale, it plainly does not extend to a breach of warranty action arising from the sale. Keller v. Merrick, 955 P.2d 876,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1998).

Slipping saddle due to loose cinch was an inherent risk of horseback riding under Wyoming Recreation Safety Act, and therefore horse provider had no duty to protect customers against it. Cooperman v. David, 214 F.3d 1162, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 11925 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2000).

In an action to recover for personal injuries suffered by the plaintiff while on a day trip trail horseback ride in a national forest with the defendants, the court denied the defendants' motion for summary judgment where (1) the plaintiff was a very inexperienced rider and was injured when her horse stumbled, fell, and rolled over her, and (2) the plaintiff presented an affidavit from a master riding instructor who opined that the defendants' failure to properly educate the plaintiff on how to handle the horse, their failure to match the plaintiff to the horse, combined with taking the plaintiff up a steep rocky slope with no marked trail created a risk of the horse slipping and falling that was not inherent in day trip trail horseback riding. Carden v. Kelly, 175 F. Supp. 2d 1318, 2001 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 20055 (D. Wyo. 2001).

Ski lifts. —

In answer to two certified questions, the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that Wyoming's Recreational Safety Act (RSA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-1-121

et seq., does not apply to a cause of action based upon the design or manufacture of sport or recreational equipment or products or safety equipment used incidental to or required by the sport or recreational opportunity. That exemption does not exclude the operation of a ski lift by a recreational provider from the protections of the RSA.
Muller v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort, 2006 WY 100, 139 P.3d 1162,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2006).

Preemption by federal law not shown. —

In an action to recover for personal injuries suffered by the plaintiff
while on a day trip trail horseback ride in a national forest with
the defendants, the court found that the Wyoming Recreation Safety
Act (§§

1-1-121

through

1-1-123

) was not preempted by Forest Service regulations and
the defendants' special-use permit.
Carden v. Kelly, 175 F. Supp. 2d 1318, 2001 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 20055 (D. Wyo. 2001).

River rafting. —

River rafting operator failed to produce any admissible evidence that bumping heads with another passenger was an inherent risk in river rafting, and therefore operator was not entitled to summary judgment under Recreation Safety Act. Madsen v. Wyoming River Trips, Inc., 31 F. Supp. 2d 1321, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 77 (D. Wyo. 1999).

Wyoming Recreation Safety Act does not establish public policy creating a public duty for equine providers. Street v. Darwin Ranch, Inc., 75 F. Supp. 2d 1296, 1999 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17646 (D. Wyo. 1999).

Snowboarding injuries. —

Under the Wyoming Recreation Safety Act, there were no issues of material fact about the duty in a snowboarding fatality case when the question was whether the loss of control by an experienced 16 year old snowboarder, familiar with a man-made tabletop jump, was an inherent risk when the jump was altered the night before the accident, tested the morning of the accident, used throughout the day, and located in a specially designed roped-off terrain park containing other man-made jumps and warning signs on national forest land. Estate of Harshman v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp., 200 F. Supp. 2d 1329, 2002 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7946 (D. Wyo. 2002), vacated, 379 F.3d 1161, 2004 U.S. App. LEXIS 16758 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2004).

Once a skier asked a resort employee how to exit the advanced terrain park area without “taking” any of the features, the resort had a duty to provide her with appropriate instructions, which might have included a specific warning to beware of the drop into the half-pipe at the end of the catwalk that provided an exit out of the terrain park area, and the trial court erred when it found that the risk of falling into the half-pipe was an inherent risk of the skier's alpine skiing and that therefore the resort did not owe her a duty under the Recreation Safety Act. Dunbar v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp., 392 F.3d 1145, 2004 U.S. App. LEXIS 25807 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2004).

Provisions not affected by comparative negligence statute.
—

The Recreation Safety Act, §

1-1-121

to this section, is intended to limit the duty which a provider owes to a participant, and is not affected by the adoption of the comparative negligence statute, §

1-1-109

.Halpern v. Wheeldon, 890 P.2d 562,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1995).

Inherent risk. —

Finding that the horse rider's injuries were the result of an inherent risk of horseback riding as defined by the Wyoming Recreation Safety Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

1-1-121

to

1-1-123

, was proper because the legislature defined the term “inherent risk” in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-1-122(a)(i)and the district court did not err in declining to further define the legislature's language. The district court properly instructed the jury and provided an appropriate form of special verdict for the jury's use.
Beckwith v. Weber, 2012 WY 62, 277 P.3d 713,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2012).

In an action against a ski resort, conclusory expert testimony was not itself enough to preclude summary judgment under the Wyoming Recreation Safety Act. The expert’s testimony contained no analysis about the inherent risk of encountering covered boulders on off-piste trails, or whether this hazard was an inherent risk of a trail littered with trees and other natural obstacles. Roberts v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp., 884 F.3d 967, 2018 U.S. App. LEXIS 5552 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2018).

District court did not err by granting the ski resort summary judgment under the Wyoming Recreation Safety Act (WRSA) in the skier’s negligence lawsuit because the skier’s injury, which was caused when he skied into an unmarked six-and-a-half foot tree on an off-piste run that was submerged and made invisible by a recent heavy snowfall, was an inherent risk of skiing for which the WRSA precluded liability. Standish v. Jackson Hole Mt. Resort Corp., 997 F.3d 1095, 2021 U.S. App. LEXIS 14338 (10th Cir. 2021).

Jury decides whether risk inherent to sport. —

Whether a particular risk is inherent to a sport or recreational opportunity, when genuine issues of material fact exist, is properly presented to the jury. Halpern v. Wheeldon, 890 P.2d 562,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1995).

Application to golf. —

Genuine questions of material fact existed as to whether the operator of a golf course increased the risk that a spectator would be struck by a golf ball, beyond the risk inherent in the sport, when the course's agent instructed a player to tee off when golfers and spectators were on and around the green and the player expressed concern that he could hit the group ahead of him.
Creel v. L & L, 2012 WY 124, 287 P.3d 729,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2012).

Quoted in

Halvorson v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2015
WY 18,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Feb. 4, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Recreational Injuries and Inherent Risks: Wyoming's Recreation Safety Act: An Update,” see XXXIII Land & Water L. Rev. 249 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injuries to, or death of, water-skiers, 34 ALR5th 77.

§ 1-1-123.1.
Ski Safety Act; short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Ski Safety Act.”

History.

2017 ch. 192, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 192, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 1-1-123.2.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Freestyle terrain” includes terrain parks and terrain features such as jumps, rails, half pipes and other constructed and natural features found in terrain parks;

“Inherent risk” with regard to skiing in a ski area means those dangers or conditions which are part of the sport of skiing, including:

Changing weather conditions;

Falling or surface snow conditions, whether natural or man-made, as they exist or change;

Surface or subsurface conditions including bare spots, forest growth, rocks, stumps, streambeds, cliffs, extreme terrain, trees or other natural objects;

Collisions or impacts with natural objects such as the objects specified in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph including encounters with wildlife;

Impact with ski lift towers, signs, posts, fences or enclosures, hydrants, water pipes or other man-made structures and their components subject to W.S.

1-1-123

.3(k);

Variations in steepness or terrain, whether natural or as a result of ski trail or feature design, or snowmaking or grooming operations such as roads, freestyle terrain, jumps and catwalks or other terrain modifications; and

Collisions with other skiers.

“Ski area” means the ski trails and other places within the boundary of a ski area under the control of a ski area operator and administered as a single enterprise within the state;

“Ski area operator” means a person having the responsibility for the operations of a ski area and the owners, partners and members, managers, employees, agents, volunteers, board members, representatives, affiliates and assigns of the person. “Ski area operator” includes an agency of the state or a political subdivision thereof;

“Ski area vehicle” means a vehicle used in the operation and maintenance of a ski area which is owned by or under the direction and control of the ski area operator such as a snowmobile, all-terrain vehicle, snow grooming vehicle, sled and other similar vehicle;

“Ski lift” means a chairlift, gondola, tramway, cable car or other aerial lift and any rope tow, conveyor, t-bar, j-bar, handle tow or other surface lift used by a ski area operator to transport skiers;

“Ski trail” means a trail, slope, run, freestyle terrain, competition terrain, tree skiing area, tubing park area or other area at or near a ski area designated by the ski area operator to be used by skiers for the purpose of skiing;

“Skier” means a person who is using a ski area for the purpose of skiing;

“Skiing” includes sliding downhill or jumping on snow or ice on skis or a toboggan, sled, tube, snowbike, snowboard or other device;

“This act” means W.S.

1-1-123

.1 through 1-1-123.5.

History.

2017 ch. 192, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 192, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 1-1-123.3.
Duties of ski area operators; signs for trails; notices to skiers; duties of skiers.

A ski area operator shall post and maintain a sign visible to skiers at or near the beginning of a trail that depicts and explains the degree of difficulty of the trail relative to each individual ski area.

A ski area operator shall post and maintain a sign at or near the loading area of a ski lift that states the relative degree of difficulty of the trails serviced by the lift.

A ski area operator shall print a warning notice on all ski lift tickets and season passes and shall post and maintain a warning sign at or near the ski area’s ticket sales building that is no smaller than six (6) square feet in size and states the following:

WARNING. Under Wyoming law, a skier assumes the inherent risks of skiing and is legally responsible for damage, injury or death to person or property that results from the inherent risks of skiing.

A ski area operator shall post and maintain a warning sign at the ski area’s ticket sales building that is no smaller than six (6) square feet in size and that notifies the skier of the duties imposed on the skier by this act and the limitations on liability provided in this act.

A ski area operator shall:

Mark or identify on trail maps the ski area boundaries;

Post a sign notifying the public if a trail or portion thereof is closed at the identified entrance of the trail or portion thereof. A trail without an identified entrance may be closed with ropes or fences.

A ski area operator shall have no duty arising out of the operator’s status as a ski area operator to a skier skiing beyond a ski area boundary marked or identified as required by subsection (e) of this section or skiing in an area posted as closed or otherwise fenced or roped off in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.

A ski area operator shall post signs in the ski area or on trail maps warning skiers of encounters with ski area vehicles.

A ski area operator shall equip ski area vehicles with a light and a fluorescent flag mounted at least five (5) feet above the bottom of the vehicle’s tracks visible at any time the vehicle is moving on or in the vicinity of a ski trail.

A ski area operator shall annually inspect, operate and maintain ski lifts in accordance with the most current version of the American National Standards Institute B-77.1 aerial tramway standards. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a ski lift shall not be deemed a common carrier.

A ski area operator shall mark hydrants, water pipes and all other man-made structures on slopes and trails which are not visible to skiers under conditions of ordinary visibility from a distance of one hundred (100) feet and shall cover the structures with a shock-absorbent material typically used by ski area operators for the purpose. Any type of marker shall be sufficient under this subsection including but not limited to wooden poles, flags or signs if the marker is visible from a distance of one hundred (100) feet and if the marker itself does not constitute a serious hazard to skiers. As used in this subsection “man-made structures” shall not include variations in steepness or terrain, whether natural or as a result of slope design, snowmaking or grooming operations, including but not limited to roads, catwalks and other terrain modifications.

A skier shall have the responsibility to observe all posted information and other signs and warnings posted in accordance with this act and shall be presumed to have seen and understood all signs, warnings and other information posted in accordance with this act.

History.

2017 ch. 192, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 192, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 1-1-123.4.
Assumption of risks; limitations on actions.

A skier expressly accepts and assumes the inherent risks of skiing and is legally responsible for damage, injury or death to himself or other persons or property that results from the inherent risks in skiing.

A skier may not make any claim against or recover from any ski area operator for injury resulting from any inherent risk of skiing.

A skier is not precluded under this act from suing another skier for any damage, injury or death to person or property that results from the other skiers’ acts or omissions. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the risk of collision with other skiers is not an inherent risk nor a risk assumed by a skier in an action by a skier against another skier.

History.

2017 ch. 192, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 192, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 1-1-123.5.
Negligence; civil actions.

A violation by any person or ski area operator of any provision of this act shall, to the extent the violation causes damage, injury or death to person or property, constitute evidence of negligence on the part of the person or ski area operator violating this act.

Actions based upon negligence of a person or ski area operator wherein the damage, injury or death is not the result of an inherent risk of skiing shall be preserved pursuant to W.S.

1-1-109

.

History.

2017 ch. 192, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 192, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 1-1-124.
Pretrial
screening.

The supreme court may promulgate rules to provide a screening procedure to expedite the prelitigation resolution of claims arising from any alleged act, error or omission in the rendering of licensed or certified professional or health care services.

The screening procedure authorized by this section shall be designed to reduce the burden of malpractice cases on the state judicial system and to encourage the prompt resolution of nonmeritorious claims. The expedited procedure may include the creation of professional review panels to review claims and to determine:

Whether there is substantial evidence that the acts complained of occurred, constituted malpractice and resulted in injury to the claimant; and

A recommended award if requested by the parties.

The supreme court shall annually report to the joint judiciary interim committee the costs of operating the expedited screening procedure and shall submit a recommendation for the proration and assessment of costs among the professions subject to the pretrial screening procedure.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 262, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-1-121

; 2008, ch. 44, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to professional review panel, see §

9-2-1801

et seq. and notes thereto.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “joint judiciary interim committee” for “legislature” in (c).

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, ch. 228, § 1, and ch. 262, § 1, both enacted a §

1-1-121

; the section enacted by ch. 262, § 1, was therefore changed to §

1-1-124

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Stated

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Ass'n of Consulting Eng'rs & Land Surveyors v. Sullivan, 798 P.2d 826,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1990).

§ 1-1-125.
Immunity for volunteers; volunteer firefighters; search and rescue.

As used in this section:

“Compensation” does not include actual and necessary expenses that are incurred by a volunteer in connection with the services that the volunteer performs for a nonprofit organization and that are reimbursed to the volunteer or otherwise paid nor does it include any incidental personal privileges received by volunteers for their services;

“Nonprofit organization” means those nonprofit organizations exempt from federal income tax pursuant to section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code;

“Volunteer” means:

An officer, director, trustee or other person who performs services for a nonprofit organization but does not receive compensation, either directly or indirectly, for those services;

A volunteer firefighter who performs services for a volunteer fire department under W.S. 35-9-616(a)(ix) whether or not the firefighter receives compensation or a pension;

An individual engaged in search and rescue operations under a county sheriff’s coordination pursuant to W.S. 18-3-609(a)(iii) or supervision pursuant to W.S.

19-16-101

whether or not the individual receives compensation.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a volunteer who provides services or performs duties on behalf of a nonprofit organization, a volunteer fire department or a sheriff as part of a search and rescue operation is personally immune from civil liability for any act or omission resulting in damage or injury if at the time of the act or omission:

The person was acting within the scope of his duties as a volunteer for the nonprofit organization, volunteer fire department or a sheriff as part of a search and rescue operation; and

The act or omission did not constitute willful or wanton misconduct or gross negligence.

This section does not grant immunity to any person causing damage as a result of the negligent operation of a motor vehicle.

In any suit against a nonprofit organization, a volunteer fire department or a sheriff as part of a search and rescue operation for civil damages based upon the negligent act or omission of a volunteer, proof of the act or omission shall be sufficient to establish the responsibility of the organization, department or sheriff under the doctrine of respondeat superior, notwithstanding the immunity granted to the volunteer with respect to any act or omission included under subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 32, § 1; 1997, ch. 155, § 1; 2017 ch. 113, § 1, effective March 2, 2017; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by
ch. 113, § 1, redesignated former (a)(iii) as (a)(iii) through (a)(iii)(B);
in (a)(iii)(B), substituted “ W.S.

35-9-601

-(h)” for “35-9-616(a)(ix)” and “the
firefighter” for “he”; added (a)(iii)(C); in
(b) and (b)(i), added “or a sheriff as part of a search and
rescue operation”; in (d), added “or a sheriff as part
of a search and rescue operation”, substituted “department
or sheriff under the doctrine” for “department under
the doctrine”; and made related changes.

Laws 2017, ch. 113, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art.
4, § 8, Wy. Const. Approved Mar. 2, 2017.

The second 2017 amendment, by
ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, near the end substituted “35-9-616(a)(ix)”
for “35-9-601(h).”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Internal Revenue Code. —

Section 501(c) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in subsection (a)(ii), appears as 26 U.S.C. § 501(c).

Prospective application. —

Laws 1992, ch. 32, § 2, provides: “The provisions of this act shall apply only to causes of action accruing on or after July 1, 1992.”

§ 1-1-126.
Civil liability for stalking.

A person who is the victim of stalking as defined by W.S.

6-2-506

may maintain a civil action against an individual who engages in a course of conduct that is prohibited under W.S.

6-2-506

for damages incurred by the victim as a result of that conduct. The aggrieved party may also seek and be awarded exemplary damages, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs of the action.

A civil action may be maintained under this section whether or not the individual who is alleged to have engaged in a course of conduct prohibited under W.S.

6-2-506

has been charged or convicted under W.S.

6-2-506

for the alleged crime.

Neither the pendency nor the termination of a civil action under this section shall prevent the criminal prosecution of a person who violates W.S.

6-2-506

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 92, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

As to the enactment of another §

1-1-126

by Laws 1993, ch. 61, § 1, see §

1-1-127

and notes thereto.

Evidence sufficient to establish stalking. —

In an action by the owner of a funeral home against the county coroner and the owner of another funeral home alleging a protected property interest in a rotation policy established by the coroner, the evidence was sufficient to support a jury verdict on the cross-claim of the defendant funeral home owner for stalking where (1) the plaintiff told the defendant that he would ruin him financially and in terms of his reputation, (2) after the defendant opened his funeral home, the plaintiff followed him around the community at least once a month, (3) the defendant, who also operated an ambulance service, testified that the plaintiff often drove to the scene of an ambulance call and watched him, and (4) the jury saw a remarkably complex diagram created by the plaintiff with the defendant's name in the middle surrounded by the names of 14 other members of the community. Veile v. Martinson, 258 F.3d 1180, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 17097 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Hoblyn v. Johnson, 2002 WY 152, 55 P.3d 1219,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2002); Dave v. Valdez, 2012 WY 59, 275 P.3d 485,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Apr. 13, 2012).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Utilizing the Tools: Successfully Implementing the Stalking Statutes,” see XXXV Land & Water L. Rev. 521 (2000).

§ 1-1-127.
Civil liability for shoplifting.

A person over ten (10) years of age who violates W.S.

6-3-402

with regard to property offered for sale by a wholesale or retail store is civilly liable to the merchant of the property in an amount consisting of:

Return of the property in original condition or actual damages equal to the full marked or listed price of the property; plus

A civil liability of twice the amount of the full marked or listed price of the property but not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00); plus

Reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs.

If an unemancipated minor violates W.S.

6-3-402

with regard to property offered for sale by a wholesale or retail store, the parents or guardian of the child shall be civilly liable as provided by subsection (a) of this section, provided liability under this subsection shall not apply to foster parents, to parents whose parental custody and control of the child have been terminated by court order prior to the violation or to any governmental or private agency that has been appointed guardian for the minor child pursuant to court order or action of the department of family services. Civil liability under this subsection is not subject to the limitation on liability provided by W.S.

14-2-203

or any other law that limits the liability of parents for damages caused by an unemancipated minor.

A conviction or a plea of guilty to a violation of W.S.

6-3-402

with regard to property offered for sale by a wholesale or retail store is not a prerequisite to the bringing of a civil suit under this section.

An action to recover damages and any civil liability under this section may be brought in small claims court if the total amount of the demand for damages and any civil liability does not exceed the jurisdiction of that court, or in any other appropriate court.

In order to recover damages and any civil liability under this act, the merchant of the property shall also notify law enforcement officials.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 61, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-1-126

; 2020 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a), (b), and (c) substituted “W.S.

6-3-402

with regard to property offered for sale by a wholesale or retail store” for “W.S. 6-3-404(a) or (b).”

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted as §

1-1-126

but, since another §

1-1-126

had been enacted by Laws 1993, ch. 92, § 1, this section has been redesignated as §

1-1-127

.

Measure of damages. —

Amount of restitution order under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-103(b) related to larceny conviction was inappropriate because the actual pecuniary damages suffered by the store under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-9-101(a)(iii) was the sale price of the clothes taken, not the full retail value, as that was the fair market value on the date of the loss; the store was entitled to the damages it could recover in a civil action under this section.
Solis v. State, 2010 WY 165, 245 P.3d 323,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 2010).

§ 1-1-128.
Civil liability for theft of identity.

A person who is the victim of theft of identity as defined by W.S.

6-3-901

may maintain a civil action to enjoin or restrain any violation of W.S.

6-3-901

and may in the same action seek damages from the person violating W.S. 6-3-901. In order to maintain an action for injunctive relief under this section, it is not necessary for the plaintiff to show actual damages or the threat of actual damages. A prevailing party in an action under this section may recover court costs and reasonable attorney fees.

A conviction or plea of guilty is not a prerequisite to the bringing of a civil action under this section.

A cause of action for theft of identity is not deemed to have accrued until the wrongdoer is discovered.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the criminal prosecution of a person for theft of identity. However, any payment made by the defendant to a victim pursuant to an order for restitution entered in a criminal case pursuant to W.S.

6-3-901

and

7-9-101

through

7-9-115

, shall be set off against any judgment in favor of the victim in a civil action brought under this section arising out of the same facts or event.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 175, § 1.

Cited

in

Dave v. Valdez, 2012 WY 59, 275 P.3d 485,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Apr. 13, 2012).

§ 1-1-129.
Immunity
from liability for volunteer health care professionals; insurance
required of nonprofit health care facility.

As used in this section:

“Health care professional” means any of the following who provide medical or dental diagnosis, care or treatment:

Physicians, osteopaths and physician assistants licensed to practice as provided in title 33, chapter 26 of the Wyoming statutes;

All nurses licensed to practice as provided in title 33, chapter 21 of the Wyoming statutes;

Pharmacists licensed to practice as provided in title 33, chapter 24 of the Wyoming statutes;

Dentists and dental hygienists licensed to practice as provided in title 33, chapter 15 of the Wyoming statutes; and

Optometrists licensed to practice as provided in title 33, chapter 23 of the Wyoming statutes.

“Low income uninsured person” means a person who meets all of the following requirements:

The person’s income is not greater than two hundred percent (200%) of the current poverty line as defined by federal law, as amended;

The person currently is not receiving medical, disability or other assistance under any federal or state government health care program; and

Either of the following applies:

The person is not a policyholder, certificate holder, insured, contract holder, subscriber, enrollee, member, beneficiary or other covered individual under a health insurance or health care policy, contract or plan; or

The person is a policyholder, certificate holder, insured, contract holder, subscriber, enrollee, member, beneficiary or other covered individual under a health insurance or health care policy, contract or plan, but the insurer, policy, contract or plan denies coverage or is the subject of insolvency or bankruptcy proceedings in any jurisdiction.

“Nonprofit health care facility” means a charitable nonprofit corporation or association organized and operated under title 17, chapters 19 or 22 of the Wyoming statutes, or any charitable organization not organized and not operated for profit, that exclusively provides health care services to low income uninsured persons, except that “health care facility” does not include a hospital, including a swing bed hospital, facility or center defined under W.S.

35-2-901

or any other medical facility that is operated for profit;

“Operation” means an invasive procedure that involves cutting or otherwise infiltrating human tissue by mechanical means, including surgery, laser surgery, ionizing radiation, therapeutic ultrasound or the removal of intraocular foreign bodies. “Operation” does not include the administration of medication by injection, unless the injection is administered in conjunction with a procedure infiltrating human tissue by mechanical means other than the administration of medicine by injection;

“Tort action” means a civil action for damages for injury, death or loss to person or property other than a civil action for damages for a breach of contract or another agreement between persons or government entities;

“Volunteer” means an individual who provides any medical, dental or other health care related diagnosis, care or treatment without the expectation of receiving, and without receipt of, any compensation or other form of remuneration from a low income uninsured person, another person on behalf of a low income uninsured person, any health care facility or any other person or government entity.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a health care professional who is a volunteer and complies with subsection (c) of this section is not liable in damages to any person or government entity in a tort or other civil action, including an action on a medical, dental or other health-related claim for injury, death or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from an action or omission of the volunteer in the provision at a nonprofit health care facility to a low income uninsured person of medical, dental or other health-related diagnosis, care or treatment, including the provision of samples of medicine and other medical or dental products, unless the action or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct.

To qualify for immunity under subsection (b) of this section, a volunteer health care professional shall do all of the following prior to the initial diagnosis, care or treatment:

Inform the person of the provisions of this section either personally or by means of a writing so stating provided by the nonprofit health care facility and signed by the person, or by another individual on behalf of, and in the presence of, the person; and

Obtain the informed consent of the person and a written waiver, signed by the person, or by another individual on behalf of, and in the presence of, the person.

Except as provided in this subsection, the immunities provided by subsection (b) of this section are not available to a volunteer health care professional, if at the time of an alleged injury, death or loss to person or property, the volunteer health care professional involved was performing an operation or delivering a baby. This subsection does not apply to a volunteer health care professional who provides diagnosis, care or treatment or performs an operation or delivers a baby when necessary to preserve the life of a person in a medical emergency.

In order for the immunity under subsection (b) of this section to apply and before the rendering of any services by the volunteer health care professional at the nonprofit health care facility, there must be a written agreement between the volunteer health care professional and the facility pursuant to which the volunteer health care professional will provide medical, dental or health care related diagnosis, care or treatment under the control of the facility to patients of the facility.

A nonprofit health care facility entering into a written agreement under subsection (e) of this section shall maintain liability coverage of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) per occurrence, except that no such coverage shall be required to be maintained by the facility if such coverage is maintained by all volunteer health care professionals rendering services at the facility. A nonprofit health care facility shall be liable for the negligent acts of a volunteer health care professional providing diagnosis, care or treatment at the facility only in the circumstances and to the extent the facility is required to maintain liability coverage under this subsection.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 100, § 1; 2004, ch. 90, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

inserted “volunteer” preceding “health care professional” throughout; and in (f) added the exception at the end of the first sentence and the condition at the end of the second sentence.

Laws 2004, ch. 90, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.